Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2434.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code, is amended by adding a section to read:1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 Section 603.2. Expedited High Density Housing Approval.--(a) No later than one year after the effective date of this subsection, the department shall adopt rules and an application process requiring the governing body of a municipality to issue a land use decision that fast tracks the land use approval process.(b) This section shall apply to planned residential developments and to residential zoning districts in which the proposed housing type is permitted by right under the applicable zoning ordinance.(c) A municipality shall implement the provisions of this section in accordance with housing development initiatives administered by the department to the extent permitted by law.(d) A rule established under this section shall only apply to lots or parcels that are:(1) Lawfully established units of land.(2) Within a designated growth area or future growth area.(3) Zoned to allow residential use.(4) Not within an area identified in an inventory or map that is part of the municipality's comprehensive plan as:(i) environmentally sensitive or containing significant natural resources;(ii) open space or scenic areas; or(iii) natural hazard areas, including floodplains, river greenways, landslide zones or wildfire risk areas.(5) Vacant, including a lot or parcel:(i) Created by any lawful division of land, regardless of when the division occurred.(ii) Improved with a nonresidential structure that 20260HB2434PN3239 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 is nonconforming or not suitable for any lawful use.(e) Residential development approved under this section shall only include:(1) Attached or detached housing, including accessory dwelling units.(2) Housing that complies with applicable minimum density requirements of the municipality's comprehensive plan or land use regulations.(3) Housing development plans that require new or repaired roads or new or modified utility lines.(f) The department shall specify for the approved residential development types allowed under this section:(1) Applicable design standards and the scope of the design review, which shall include requiring the approval of the use of any material, design or method of construction that is approved under the applicable building code or approved under subsection (i).(2) Limits on land use, including establishing appropriate minimum or maximum setbacks, parking requirements, floor-to-area ratios or minimum dwelling units per acre.(3) Municipal standards for tree removal, replacement or planting, including requiring a developer and builder to replace or replant trees for development resulting in a loss of existing tree canopy.(g) Specifications adopted under subsection (f) may not establish standards that have the effect of suppressing efforts to increase residential density and the construction of housing units.(h) (1) In adopting rules under this section, the 20260HB2434PN3239 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department shall coordinate with the review of building construction plans by the department under subsection (i).(2) In implementing this section, the department shall coordinate with approvals of land use plans by the department under this section.(i) The department shall designate a process by which an applicant for a building permit for a residential structure of a type described in subsection (e)(1) shall receive expedited building construction plan approval from the municipality, including through the use of:(1) Typical drawings and specifications created by the department.(2) Review of plans and specifications approved by the department, which shall remain proprietary unless the submitter requests otherwise.(3) An expedited and concurrent approval process that may include third-party review and deemed approval language.(j) In implementing this section, the department and municipalities shall coordinate with a Commonwealth Housing Ombudsman to facilitate expedited review, resolve interagency or municipal delays and promote compliance with applicable permitting timelines.(k) The department shall establish or designate a technical assistance and expertise hub to support municipalities in implementing this section, including assistance with developing preapproved building plans, updating zoning or land use procedures, streamlining permitting processes and ensuring compliance with applicable statutory timelines.(l) A municipality may build capacity at the municipal or regional level to support the planning, permitting, 20260HB2434PN3239 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 administration and implementation of housing development under this section, including through technical assistance, planning support and assistance provided by housing coalitions, redevelopment authorities or other qualified entities.(m) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Municipality." A county, city, borough, incorporated town or township.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2434PN3239 - 5 - 123456789101112